Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Chapter 1 General Provisions
§ 30-1-109.
Relocation of abandoned claims.

Any abandoned lode, vein or strata claim may be relocated and the relocation shall be perfected by fixing new boundaries in the same manner as provided for the location of a new claim. The relocator shall erect new or adopt the old boundaries, renewing the posts or monuments of stone if removed or destroyed and fix a new location stake. The location certificate of an abandoned claim may state that the whole or any part of the new location is located as an abandoned claim.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 2552; C.S. 1910, § 3473; C.S. 1920, § 4396; R.S. 1931, § 70-120; C.S. 1945, § 57-920; W.S. 1957, § 30-9; Laws 1981, ch. 91, § 1.

Invalid relocation is not abandonment. —

If a second location of a mining claim, with same name and boundaries as the first, attempted by original locators, should be found invalid, attempt to relocate will not constitute abandonment of forfeiture of former location. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Abandonment is matter of intention. —

In determining whether one has abandoned his property or rights, the intention is the paramount object of inquiry, and where plaintiff leased certain land to defendant for purpose of boring for oil and gas, operations to be commenced within a year, and operations were begun within that time, well drilled, and some seven months thereafter lessee returned to drill another well when plaintiff revoked the lease, there was no intention by lessee to abandon lease. Phillips v. Hamilton, 17 Wyo. 41, 95 P. 846,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1908); Douglas Oil Fields v. Hamilton, 17 Wyo. 54, 95 P. 849,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1908).

No rights acquired absent compliance with section. —

Defendants acquired no rights of any kind or nature relative to locating certain lode uranium claims, where said claims were relocations of abandoned lode claims, and defendants did not fix, in most instances, any new location stakes as required by this section. MacGuire v. Sturgis, 347 F. Supp. 580, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13022 (D. Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

See “The Description of a Mining Claim,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 224.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 33.04, 38.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-110.
Location certificate for placer claims.

Hereafter the discoverer of any placer claim shall, within ninety (90) days after the date of discovery, cause such claim to be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county within which such claim may exist, by filing therein a location certificate, which shall contain the following:

The name of the claim, designating it as a placer claim;

The name or names of the locator or locators thereof;

The date of location;

The number of feet or acres thus claimed;

A description of the claim by such designation of natural or fixed objects as shall identify the claim beyond question.

Before filing such location certificate, the discoverer shall locate his claim:

By securely fixing upon such claim a notice in plain painted, printed or written letters, containing the name of the claim, the name of the locator or locators, the date of the discovery, and the number of feet or acres claimed;

By designating the surface boundaries by substantial posts or stone monuments at each corner of the claim.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 2553; Laws 1901, ch. 100, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3474; C.S. 1920, § 4397; R.S. 1931, § 70-121; C.S. 1945, § 57-921; W.S. 1957, § 30-10; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “office of the county clerk.”

Discovery is essential requirement. —

An essential requirement of a valid location of a mining claim, as provided in this section, is that there shall be a discovery of mineral on the ground. Dean v. Omaha-Wyoming Oil Co., 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1913).

Location on ground covered by prior claim is void. —

Location of mining claim is void where it is made upon ground covered at the time by a prior, valid and subsisting claim. Bergquist v. West Virginia-Wyoming Copper Co., 18 Wyo. 234, 106 P. 673,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1910).

Issue of good faith in filing location certificates involves an inquiry

into the intent of the locator. United States. United States v. Zweifel, 508 F.2d 1150, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 16603 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 829, 96 S. Ct. 47, 46 L. Ed. 2d 46, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1975).

Effect of proper location and recordation. —

If one locates, marks and records his claim in accordance with federal and state law, he has an exclusive right of possession to the extent of his claim as located, with the right to extract the minerals without paying any royalty to the United States as owner, and without ever applying for a patent or seeking to obtain title to the fee. United States. United States v. Zweifel, 508 F.2d 1150, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 16603 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 829, 96 S. Ct. 47, 46 L. Ed. 2d 46, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1975).

Improper location or recordation casts cloud on title. —

Location and recordation of claims on unappropriated public land without actual discovery of valuable minerals, or recordation without marking the claim in compliance with federal and state law casts a cloud on the title of the United States. United States v. Zweifel, 508 F.2d 1150, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 16603 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 829, 96 S. Ct. 47, 46 L. Ed. 2d 46, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1975).

Curing defective location certificates. —

If a location is merely defective in a location certificate, the defects are cured when a subsequent locator has knowledge of the prior location or if the location notice has been amended so as to comply with statutory requirements. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Sufficiency of original and amended location certificates whenconstrued together. —

The original location certificate of a mining claim and an amended certificate, if one be filed, must be construed together, and, if sufficient when so construed, the location record will be valid, although neither standing alone would be sufficient. The amended certificate, if filed, relates back to the date of the original location. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Location work must precede recording. —

Location certificates of placer claims cannot be validly recorded in the offices of the county clerks when recordee had not first done the necessary location work upon the ground. Zweifel v. State, 517 P.2d 493,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1974).

Location of posts on ground marked by U.S. surveys of publicland system. —

In locating posts for placer claims on ground marked in accord with the system of United States surveys of public land it is sufficient if the posts are placed within a few feet from the government markers. Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1948).

Notice describing section of U.S. government survey adequatewithout designating acreage. —

A notice which described three different subdivisions of a section of a United States government survey was sufficient though acreage was not designated, since the notice presumptively stated that locator claimed 120 acres, as each subdivision of a section of a United States government survey ordinarily contains 40 acres. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Conformity of the boundaries of a placer claim with the lines of the United States government survey,

by description of a placer location as covering recognized units or subdivisions of such survey, is sufficient to satisfy this section though no special name is attached to the claim. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Defective reference to symbol in notice. —

Plaintiff's notice of a placer mining claim which described location as “S.E.4 NE4 NE4 S.E.21 N.W.4 S.W.22 Section 22-21, Township 50, North, Range 66 West” was not void on the ground that symbol 1/4 was designated by 4 but was only defective, and defendant who filed a subsequent mining claim could not take advantage of the defect where the plaintiffs subsequently amended the original claim and the defendant admitted that he knew about plaintiff's claim. Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1951).

Whether timber is “substantial post” is a question of fact

and the trial court's finding upon substantial either undisputed or conflicting testimony is final. Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1948).

Certain timber deemed “substantial post.” —

A timber four inches square sunk in the ground 10 or 12 inches of its 20 or 30 inch length might fairly be regarded as a “substantial post.” Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1948).

Knowledge of boundaries of prior claims bar to attack on validity.—

Plaintiffs, who had actual knowledge of the boundaries of prior placer claims filed by the defendants, could not attack validity of location certificate for alleged technical defects in notice. Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1948).

Cited

in

Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1957).

Law reviews. —

See “Location of Mining Claims in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 220.

See “The Description of a Mining Claim,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 224.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§
32.03, 33.01, 33.03, 33.04, 33.09 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-111.
Assessment work for placer claims; character and kind.

For every placer claim, assessment work, as hereinafter provided, shall be done during each and every year after the first day of September following the date of location. Such assessment work shall consist in manual labor, permanent improvements made on the claim in buildings, roads or ditches made for the benefit of working such claims, or after any manner, so long as the work done accrues to the improvement of the claim, or shows good faith and intention on the part of the owner or owners and their intention to hold possession of said claim.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 2554; C.S. 1910, § 3475; C.S. 1920, § 4398; R.S. 1931, § 70-122; C.S. 1945, § 57-922; Laws 1951, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-11; Laws 1967, ch. 20, § 1.

Quoted

in

Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1948); Parker v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Prods. Co., 64 Wyo. 269, 189 P.2d 882,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1948).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 44.04, 44.05, 45.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-112.
Assessment work for placer claims; amount of work required; suspension by act of congress.

On all placer claims heretofore or hereafter located in this state not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) worth of assessment work shall be performed during each year from the first day of July after the date of location provided that whenever annual assessment work required by United States laws be suspended by act of congress such assessment work required by this section shall be suspended for the year or years stated in the act of congress.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 2555; Laws 1901, ch. 100, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 3476; C.S. 1920, § 4399; R.S. 1931, § 70-123; C.S. 1945, § 57-923; Laws 1951, ch. 18, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 30-12.

Editor's notes. —

The federal statute, 30 U.S.C. § 28, as amended by P.L. 85-736, approved August 23, 1958, provides that the assessment year shall run from September 1 to September 1.

Subordination to federal act. —

State statutes in reference to mining rights on United States public domain must be construed in subordination to 30 USCS § 28, which provides that period for doing required annual work shall commence on July 1st (now September 1st) succeeding date of location. Norris v. United Mineral Prods. Co., 61 Wyo. 386, 158 P.2d 679,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1945).

It is well settled that the locator need not personally dothe assessment work. —

The work may be done by an agent or representative of the locator who does the work at the instance of the locator. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Work done by U.S. government inures to claim owners. —

Development work done by United States government on uranium claims held to inure to benefit of owners of claims and their assigns and lessees as proper assessment work. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Test in determining “worth” of assessment work

done by locators is actual, reasonable value of the labor or improvements placed upon the claims for their development, and what is paid for annual labor is not criterion. Norris v. United Mineral Prods. Co., 61 Wyo. 386, 158 P.2d 679,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1945).

Whether proper assessment was done is question for trial court.—

The question whether or not proper assessment work was done is ordinarily a question of fact to be determined by trial court. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Quoted

in

Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1948); Parker v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Prods. Co., 64 Wyo. 269, 189 P.2d 882,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1948).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Assessment Work Requirement,” see 9 Wyo. L.J. 231.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 44.05, 45.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-113.
Assessment work for placer claims; upon contiguous claims.

When two (2) or more placer mining claims lie contiguous and are owned by the same person, persons, company or corporation, the yearly expenditure of labor and improvements required on each of such claims may be made upon any one (1) of such contiguous claims if the owner or owners shall thus prefer.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 2556; C.S. 1910, § 3477; C.S. 1920, § 4400; R.S. 1931, § 70-124; C.S. 1945, § 57-924; W.S. 1957, § 30-13.

Section is supplemental to federal statutes. —

This section seems to be supplemental to federal statutes on the subject. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Conditions limited to those specified in section. —

There is no indication in this section that conditions other than those specified should be affixed, namely, that owner must show that assessment work on one claim benefits contiguous claims as well. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Presumption is that work benefits all. —

While assessment work on one claim should benefit whole group, this section seems to contemplate that when work is done upon any one of contiguous placer claims owned by same party, there is a presumption that that work does benefit all the others. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

So only contiguity, common ownership and work on one need beshown. —

Where claims involved are all owned by one party, are all contiguous and are placer claims, on the face of this section, these are all facts necessary to be shown in order that work done on any one claim inures for benefit of all; provided, that the total work done is sufficient to cover assessment work of $100.00 for each claim as required by §

30-1-112

.Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Burden of showing that assessment work on any one of contiguous group-claims does not benefit all

devolves on those alleging failure to perform assessment work proper under this section. Simmons v. Muir, 75 Wyo. 44, 291 P.2d 810,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1955).

Evidence supporting finding that work did not benefit all.—

Finding by the trial court that assessment work or annual labor performed by the defendants in developing one group of bentonite claims by means of so-called stripping pits did not benefit adjoining and contiguous groups of bentonite claims was supported by substantial evidence. Parker v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Products Co., 64 Wyo. 269, 189 P.2d 882,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1948).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 44.04, 44.05, 45.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-114.
Assessment work for placer claims; effect of failure to perform.

Upon failure of the owners to do or have done the assessment work required within the time above stated, such claim or claims upon which such work has not been completed, shall thereafter be open to relocation on or after the first day of July of any year after such labor or improvements should have been done, in the same manner and on the same terms as if no location thereof had ever been made; provided, that the original locators, their heirs, assigns or legal representatives have not resumed work upon such claim or claims after failure, and before any subsequent location has been made.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 2558; C.S. 1910, § 3478; C.S. 1920, § 4401; R.S. 1931, § 70-125; C.S. 1945, § 57-925; Laws 1951, ch. 18, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 30-14.

Editor's notes. —

The federal statute, 30 U.S.C. § 28, as amended by P.L. 85-736, approved August 23, 1958, provides that the assessment year shall run from September 1 to September 1.

Quoted

in

Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1948); Parker v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Prods. Co., 64 Wyo. 269, 189 P.2d 882,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1948).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 45.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-115.
Assessment work; rental fee; affidavit required upon completion or payment.

Upon completion of the required assessment work or payment of the annual claim rental fee as required by federal law for any mining claim, the owner or owners or agent of such owner or owners shall cause to be made by some person cognizant of the facts, an affidavit setting forth that the required amount of work was done or rental fee paid, which affidavit shall within sixty (60) days of the completion of the work or payment of the fee, be filed for record, and shall thereafter be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the said claim is located.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 2559; Laws 1901, ch. 100, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 3479; C.S. 1920, § 4402; R.S. 1931, § 70-126; C.S. 1945, § 57-926; W.S. 1957, § 30-15; 1993, ch. 143, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “office of the county clerk.”

Subordination to federal act. —

State statutes in reference to mining rights on United States public domain must be construed in subordination to 30 USCS § 28, which provides that period for doing required annual work shall commence on July 1st (now September 1st) succeeding date of location. Norris v. United Mineral Prods. Co., 61 Wyo. 386, 158 P.2d 679,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1945).

Quoted

in

Scoggin v. Miller, 64 Wyo. 206, 189 P.2d 677,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1948).

Law reviews. —

See “The Assessment Work Requirements,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 231.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 44.05, 45.03, 45.05 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-116.
Patents to placer claims.

When any person, persons or association, they and their grantors, have held and worked their placer claims in conformance with the laws of this state and the regulations of the mining district in which such claim exists, if such be organized, for five (5) successive years after the first day of September succeeding the date of location, then such person, persons or association, they and their grantors, shall be entitled to proceed to obtain a patent for their claims from the United States without performing further work; but where such person, persons or association, they or their grantors, desire to obtain a United States patent before the expiration of five (5) years from the date hereinbefore mentioned, they shall be required to expend at least five hundred dollars’ ($500.00) worth of work upon a placer claim.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 24; R.S. 1899, § 2560; C.S. 1910, § 3480; C.S. 1920, § 4403; R.S. 1931, § 70-127; C.S. 1945, § 57-927; Laws 1951, ch. 18, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 30-16; Laws 1967, ch. 20, § 2.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 44.05, 45.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-117.
Use of water.

Whenever any person, persons or corporation, shall be engaged in mining or milling in this state, and in the prosecution of such business shall hoist or bring water from mines or natural water courses, such person, persons or corporation shall have the right to use such water in such manner, and direct it into such natural course or gulch as their business interests may require; provided, that such diversion shall not infringe on vested rights. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to new or undeveloped mines, but to those only which shall have been open and require drainage or other direction of water.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2535; C.S. 1910, § 3456; C.S. 1920, § 4379; R.S. 1931, § 70-103; C.S. 1945, § 57-903; W.S. 1957, § 30-17.

Cross references. —

As to appropriation and use of water by ditch companies, see §§

17-12-102

through

17-12-106

.

For duty of county clerk to keep water users records as official records, see §

18-3-402

.

As to prohibition against allowing water to be dammed so as to permit overflow on public roads or highways, or undermine, weaken or damage any bridge, etc., in connection with mining operations, see §

24-1-116

.

As to requirement of approval of plans for the construction of dams for settling purposes, to prevent contamination of streams, see §

35-4-202

.

§ 30-1-118.
Mining claims subject to right-of-way; construction of ditch or flume.

All mining claims or property now located, or which may hereafter be located within this state, shall be subject to the right-of-way of any ditch or flume for mining purposes, or of any tramway, pack-trail or wagon road, whether now in use, or which may hereafter be laid out across any such location, claim or property; provided, always, that such right-of-way shall not be exercised against any mining location, claim or property duly made and recorded as herein required, and not abandoned prior to the establishment of any such ditch, flume, tramway, pack-trail or wagon road, without the consent of the owner or owners, except in condemnation, as in the case of land taken for public highways. Consent to the location of the easement above enumerated over any mineral claim, location or property, shall be in writing; and provided, further, that any such ditch or flume shall be so constructed that water therefrom shall not injure vested rights by flooding or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 2536; C.S. 1910, § 3457; C.S. 1920, § 4380; R.S. 1931, § 70-104; C.S. 1945, § 57-904; W.S. 1957, § 30-18.

Cross references. —

As to right-of-way of mining companies over public lands, see §

30-1-128

.

As to acquisition of lands or rights-of-way, by eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

, and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

§ 30-1-119.
Protection of surface proprietors.

Where a mining right exists in any case and is separate from the ownership or right of occupancy to the surface, such owner or rightful occupant of the said surface may demand satisfactory security from the miner or miners, and if such security is refused, such owner or occupant of the surface may enjoin the miner or miners from working such mine until such security is given. The order for such injunction shall fix the amount of the bond therefor.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 2537; C.S. 1910, § 3458; C.S. 1920, § 4381; R.S. 1931, § 70-105; C.S. 1945, § 57-905; W.S. 1957, § 30-19.

Law reviews. —

See “Duty of a Uranium Miner to Support the Surface Estate,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 239.

For an address on surface damages and claims by surface estate owners against mineral estate owners, see 14 Wyo. L.J. 99 (1960).

See comment, “Subsidence Regulations,” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 543 (1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Restoration of surface after strip or other surface mining, 1 ALR2d 575.

Surface owner's right of access through solid mineral seam or vein conveyed to another, or through the space left by its removal, to reach underlying strata, water, oil, gas, etc., 25 ALR2d 1250.

Right of mineral lessee to deposit topsoil, waste materials and the like upon lessor's additional land not being mined, 26 ALR2d 1453.

Liability of mine operator for damage to surface structure by removal of lateral support, 32 A.L.R.2d 1309.

Effect, as between lessor and lessee, of provision in mineral lease purporting to except or reserve a previously granted right-of-way or other easement through, over or upon the premises, 49 ALR2d 1191.

Duty of oil or gas lessee to restore surface of leased premises upon termination of operations, 62 ALR4th 1153.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
200.02 (Matthew Bender).

§§ 30-1-120 and 30-1-121.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provisions similar to former §§

30-1-120

and 30-1-121, see §

6-3-201

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from 1888, ch. 40, §§ 9 and 10, related to obtaining possession unlawfully, and destroying mining property, respectively.

§ 30-1-122.
Defrauding, cheating or swindling by “salting”.

Any person or persons who shall defraud, cheat, swindle or deceive any party or parties in relation to any mine or mining property by “salting,” or by placing or causing to be placed in any lode, placer or other mine, any genuine metals or material representing genuine minerals, which are designed to cheat and deceive others, for the purpose of gain, whereby others shall be deceived and injured by such, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in a penal sum of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), or imprisoned in the penitentiary for not more than three (3) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 2542; C.S. 1910, § 3463; C.S. 1920, § 4386; R.S. 1931, § 70-110; C.S. 1945, § 57-910; W.S. 1957, § 30-22.

§ 30-1-123.
Protection of livestock from mining shafts.

Every person, persons, company or corporation, who have already sunk mining shafts, pits, holes, inclines, upon any mining claim, or upon any mineral property, ground or premises, or who may hereafter sink such openings aforesaid, shall forthwith secure such shafts and openings against the injury or destruction of livestock running at large upon the public domain, by securely covering such shafts and other openings as aforesaid, in a manner to render them safe against the possibility of livestock falling into them or in any manner becoming injured or destroyed thereby; or by forthwith making a strong, secure and ample fence around such shafts and other openings aforesaid. Any person, persons, corporation or company who shall fail or refuse to fully comply with the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof shall be subject to imprisonment in a county jail for not more than ninety (90) days or fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or both such imprisonment and fine in the discretion of the court imposing sentence. Any person, persons, corporation or company who shall fail or refuse to fully comply with the provisions of this section shall also be liable to the owner thereof for any damages sustained by injury or loss of livestock thereby.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 2543; C.S. 1910, § 3464; C.S. 1920, § 4387; R.S. 1931, § 70-111; C.S. 1945, § 57-911; Laws 1957, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-23.

Cited

in

Chicago & N.W. Ry. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 30-1-124.
Length of lode claim.

The length of any lode mining claim located within Wyoming, shall not exceed fifteen hundred (1,500) feet measured horizontally along such lode or vein. Nor can the regulations of any mining district limit a location to less than this length.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 2544; C.S. 1910, § 3465; C.S. 1920, § 4388; R.S. 1931, § 70-112; C.S. 1945, § 57-912; W.S. 1957, § 30-24.

Law reviews. —

See “Location of Mining Claims in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 220.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 32.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-125.
Width of lode claim.

The width of any lode claim located within Wyoming shall not exceed three hundred (300) feet on each side of the discovery shaft, the discovery shaft being always equally distant from the side lines of the claims. Nor can any mining district limit the location to a width of less than one hundred fifty (150) feet on either side of the discovery shaft.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 2545; C.S. 1910, § 3466; C.S. 1920, § 4389; R.S. 1931, § 70-113; C.S. 1945, § 57-913; W.S. 1957, § 30-25.

“Width of any lode claim” construed. —

The provision of this section that the “width of any lode claim located within Wyoming shall not exceed three hundred (300) feet on each side of the discovery shaft, the discovery shaft being always equally distant from the sidelines of the claims,” means that in no instance may a claim extend to more than 300 feet from the center point between the sidelines. A deviation of the discovery shaft from the original center point cannot alter the position of the sideline closest thereto, but automatically delimits the position of the other sideline to a point “equally distant” from the discovery shaft. Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1957).

Loss only of width exceeding amount allowed. —

Claim of plaintiff was not invalidated where discovery point was not in the center of the claim, but plaintiff lost that part of his claim which was in excess of the amount allowed by this section. Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1957).

Law reviews. —

For note on Globe Mining Co. v. Anderson, 78 Wyo. 17, 318 P.2d 373,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1957), and the mining laws, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 43 (1958).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§
32.03, 33.01, 33.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-126.
W.S. 30-1-101 through 30-1-126 not applicable to coal mines.

Nothing in this act [§§

30-1-101

through

30-1-126

] shall apply to the working of coal mines.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 40, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 2561; C.S. 1910, § 3481; C.S. 1920, § 4404; R.S. 1931, § 70-128; C.S. 1945, § 57-928; W.S. 1957, § 30-26.

§ 30-1-127.
Charge for assays at university.

Hereafter the charge for making assays or tests for silver, gold, copper and lead at the University of Wyoming shall be in accordance with a fee schedule established by the university for charges to any resident of the state.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 79, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3482; C.S. 1920, § 4405; R.S. 1931, § 70-129; C.S. 1945, § 57-929; W.S. 1957, § 30-27; Laws 1971, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 30-1-128.
Construction or operation of railroads or roads by mining companies.

Any corporation or association of persons organized under this article or under the laws of any other state and doing business in this state, now or hereafter engaged in mining gold or silver bearing quartz rock, coal, lead, iron, copper or other materials, may construct or operate a railroad, tramway road or wagon road from their said mine or mines, to any point or points desired by them, and shall have the exclusive right-of-way to the line of their road over the unoccupied public domain for the space of not exceeding one hundred (100) feet on either side thereof, and also, the exclusive possession at the termini of their said road, and at such intermediate points as may be required, for depots, buildings, turntables, water tanks, machine shops and other necessary appurtenances of a railroad, and said corporation or association of persons may file a survey or diagram of such line of road with the lands claimed by them on either side thereof, and also the land claimed at the termini aforesaid, with the secretary of state, and it shall not be lawful for any person or persons to construct any road or erect any buildings or otherwise interfere with the possession of the land so indicated in the survey or diagram as filed aforesaid, and a certified copy of said survey under the seal of the state shall be received in evidence in all courts of law or equity within the state.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. 1, § 24; R.S. 1887, § 525; R.S. 1899, § 3059; C.S. 1910, § 4002; C.S. 1920, § 5075; R.S. 1931, § 28-142; C.S. 1945, § 44-136; Laws 1957, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-28.

Cross references. —

As to right-of-way over mining property, see §

30-1-118

and notes thereto.

As to construction, installation and maintenance of roadbed, rails, joints, switches, frogs and other elements of track of haulage roads, see §

30-3-114

.

For requirements as to locomotives, etc., used in coal mines, see §

30-3-207

.

Law reviews. —

See “Rights of Way to Mining Claims Across Public Lands in Wyoming,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 162 (1958).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 100.04, 102.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-129.
Eminent domain for underground right-of-way easements; right of condemnation generally.

Every owner or operator of any mining claims or properties having a common corner who find it necessary for the practical or economical development thereof has the right to condemn and to take, hold and appropriate a right-of-way easement across the corner and under or through the lands of another for underground passages or tunnels, including mine access and ventilation entries. The right-of-way easement shall in no instance exceed two hundred fifty (250) feet in width and any mineral removed from under the lands of another shall be accounted for by the person exercising the rights herein granted to the owner thereof at the gross value thereof on the surface.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 244, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
100.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-1-130.
Eminent domain for underground right-of-way easements; duty to show good faith and necessity.

In order to exercise the right of eminent domain herein granted the person claiming the benefit of such right shall be required to show that the proceeding is in good faith and that the right-of-way easement is necessary to continue the practical and economical development of a commercially feasible mining operation then being conducted.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 244, § 2.